Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-1821
Plea of not guilty; record; day of trial; designation; continuance; when.

If the accused pleads not guilty, the plea shall be entered on the indictment, and the prosecuting attorney shall, under the direction of the court, designate a day for trial, which shall be a day of the term at which the plea is made, unless the court, for good reasons, continues the case to a subsequent term.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 453, p. 823;

R.S.1913, § 9097;

C.S.1922, § 10122;

C.S.1929, § 29-1820;

R.S.1943, § 29-1821.

Date for trial was properly designated. Kitts v. State, 153 Neb. 784, 46 N.W.2d 158 (1951).

Failure to endorse plea on indictment is not ground for reversal. Preuit v. People, 5 Neb. 377 (1877).